dict-sa-Latn/sa-Latn.aff
FLAG num
SFX 407 Y 1
SFX 407 0 neṣu .
SFX 519 Y 1
SFX 519 0 yante .
SFX 182 Y 1
SFX 182 0 yātām .
SFX 155 Y 1
SFX 155 0 tānām .
SFX 544 Y 1
SFX 544 0 yeran .
SFX 189 Y 1
SFX 189 0 ma .
SFX 867 Y 1
SFX 867 0 mi .
SFX 498 Y 1
SFX 498 0 tvābhyām .
SFX 775 Y 1
SFX 775 0 yamānā .
SFX 966 Y 1
SFX 966 0 nīyāyām .
SFX 693 Y 1
SFX 693 0 maḥ .
SFX 193 Y 1
SFX 193 0 ṇoḥ .
SFX 30 Y 1
SFX 30 0 yām .
SFX 417 Y 1
SFX 417 0 yān .
SFX 349 Y 1
SFX 349 0 yāt .
SFX 357 Y 1
SFX 357 0 ntam .
SFX 355 Y 1
SFX 355 0 ntau .
SFX 534 Y 1
SFX 534 0 yeya .
SFX 554 Y 1
SFX 554 0 ānena .
SFX 12 Y 1
SFX 12 0 na .
SFX 84 Y 1
SFX 84 0 ne .
SFX 38 Y 1
SFX 38 0 ni .
SFX 880 Y 1
SFX 880 0 ayā .
SFX 766 Y 1
SFX 766 0 itā .
SFX 894 Y 1
SFX 894 0 āyai .
SFX 65 Y 1
SFX 65 0 nā .
SFX 442 Y 1
SFX 442 0 nī .
SFX 578 Y 1
SFX 578 0 itānām .
SFX 896 Y 1
SFX 896 0 anābhyām .
SFX 252 Y 1
SFX 252 0 asya .
SFX 839 Y 1
SFX 839 0 māṇaḥ .
SFX 559 Y 1
SFX 559 0 ānaiḥ .
SFX 516 Y 1
SFX 516 0 yase .
SFX 334 Y 1
SFX 334 0 māna .
SFX 335 Y 1
SFX 335 0 māne .
SFX 106 Y 1
SFX 106 0 tyā .
SFX 425 Y 1
SFX 425 0 ntyoḥ .
SFX 638 Y 1
SFX 638 0 vyāḥ .
SFX 535 Y 1
SFX 535 0 yethe .
SFX 336 Y 1
SFX 336 0 māneṣu .
SFX 474 Y 1
SFX 474 0 yate .
SFX 531 Y 1
SFX 531 0 yāvahe .
SFX 927 Y 1
SFX 927 0 aneṣu .
SFX 275 Y 1
SFX 275 0 tāya .
SFX 17 Y 1
SFX 17 0 bhyām .
SFX 941 Y 1
SFX 941 0 māṇāni .
SFX 494 Y 1
SFX 494 0 yadhvam .
SFX 810 Y 1
SFX 810 0 ana .
SFX 892 Y 1
SFX 892 0 ane .
SFX 801 Y 1
SFX 801 0 ra .
SFX 674 Y 1
SFX 674 0 re .
SFX 220 Y 1
SFX 220 0 ayoḥ .
SFX 339 Y 1
SFX 339 0 mānābhyām .
SFX 944 Y 1
SFX 944 0 eva .
SFX 794 Y 1
SFX 794 0 nīyaiḥ .
SFX 732 Y 1
SFX 732 0 vyāyai .
SFX 207 Y 1
SFX 207 0 vantam .
SFX 205 Y 1
SFX 205 0 vantau .
SFX 905 Y 1
SFX 905 0 māṇebhyaḥ .
SFX 929 Y 1
SFX 929 0 anāt .
SFX 948 Y 1
SFX 948 0 māṇāyāḥ .
SFX 789 Y 1
SFX 789 0 nīyena .
SFX 188 Y 1
SFX 188 0 se .
SFX 126 Y 1
SFX 126 0 si .
SFX 24 Y 1
SFX 24 0 su .
SFX 144 Y 1
SFX 144 0 hāḥ .
SFX 529 Y 1
SFX 529 0 yāmahe .
SFX 366 Y 1
SFX 366 0 mānayā .
SFX 586 Y 1
SFX 586 0 itebhyaḥ .
SFX 878 Y 1
SFX 878 0 anti .
SFX 584 Y 1
SFX 584 0 itena .
SFX 753 Y 1
SFX 753 0 yamānayoḥ .
SFX 2 Y 1
SFX 2 0 ḥ .
SFX 450 Y 1
SFX 450 0 thuḥ .
SFX 261 Y 1
SFX 261 0 ebhyaḥ .
SFX 857 Y 1
SFX 857 0 āyāḥ .
SFX 76 Y 1
SFX 76 0 ta .
SFX 53 Y 1
SFX 53 0 te .
SFX 75 Y 1
SFX 75 0 ti .
SFX 148 Y 1
SFX 148 0 tu .
SFX 767 Y 1
SFX 767 0 ṇasya .
SFX 480 Y 1
SFX 480 0 kā .
SFX 341 Y 1
SFX 341 0 mānasya .
SFX 489 Y 1
SFX 489 0 tvāt .
SFX 427 Y 1
SFX 427 0 ntyāḥ .
SFX 971 Y 1
SFX 971 0 nīyābhyaḥ .
SFX 312 Y 1
SFX 312 0 vatyā .
SFX 98 Y 1
SFX 98 0 tīnām .
SFX 550 Y 1
SFX 550 0 ānābhyām .
SFX 92 Y 1
SFX 92 0 ṃ .
SFX 230 Y 1
SFX 230 0 sthaḥ .
SFX 215 Y 1
SFX 215 0 ataḥ .
SFX 121 Y 1
SFX 121 0 tībhyām .
SFX 9 Y 1
SFX 9 0 ām .
SFX 281 Y 1
SFX 281 0 ān .
SFX 253 Y 1
SFX 253 0 āt .
SFX 969 Y 1
SFX 969 0 nīyayā .
SFX 340 Y 1
SFX 340 0 mānena .
SFX 505 Y 1
SFX 505 0 kāyām .
SFX 119 Y 1
SFX 119 0 tīm .
SFX 356 Y 1
SFX 356 0 ntaḥ .
SFX 192 Y 1
SFX 192 0 va .
SFX 860 Y 1
SFX 860 0 ve .
SFX 792 Y 1
SFX 792 0 nīyasya .
SFX 142 Y 1
SFX 142 0 kebhyaḥ .
SFX 29 Y 1
SFX 29 0 yai .
SFX 134 Y 1
SFX 134 0 yam .
SFX 95 Y 1
SFX 95 0 yau .
SFX 779 Y 1
SFX 779 0 yamānayā .
SFX 755 Y 1
SFX 755 0 yamānataḥ .
SFX 950 Y 1
SFX 950 0 māṇāsu .
SFX 731 Y 1
SFX 731 0 vyāyām .
SFX 488 Y 1
SFX 488 0 kāyāḥ .
SFX 637 Y 1
SFX 637 0 vyaḥ .
SFX 972 Y 1
SFX 972 0 nīyābhiḥ .
SFX 218 Y 1
SFX 218 0 dbhyām .
SFX 277 Y 1
SFX 277 0 teṣu .
SFX 165 Y 1
SFX 165 0 īṣu .
SFX 740 Y 1
SFX 740 0 yamānasya .
SFX 632 Y 1
SFX 632 0 atā .
SFX 806 Y 1
SFX 806 0 atī .
SFX 958 Y 1
SFX 958 0 ata .
SFX 527 Y 1
SFX 527 0 ate .
SFX 583 Y 1
SFX 583 0 ati .
SFX 533 Y 1
SFX 533 0 yantām .
SFX 297 Y 1
SFX 297 0 tāyām .
SFX 924 Y 1
SFX 924 0 anāya .
SFX 773 Y 1
SFX 773 0 ṇebhyaḥ .
SFX 502 Y 1
SFX 502 0 tvaiḥ .
SFX 3 Y 1
SFX 3 0 bhyaḥ .
SFX 181 Y 1
SFX 181 0 ānām .
SFX 570 Y 1
SFX 570 0 ānān .
SFX 558 Y 1
SFX 558 0 ānāt .
SFX 125 Y 1
SFX 125 0 kāḥ .
SFX 294 Y 1
SFX 294 0 tābhyaḥ .
SFX 34 Y 1
SFX 34 0 ya .
SFX 117 Y 1
SFX 117 0 ye .
SFX 721 Y 1
SFX 721 0 vyāni .
SFX 97 Y 1
SFX 97 0 noḥ .
SFX 737 Y 1
SFX 737 0 vyābhiḥ .
SFX 346 Y 1
SFX 346 0 hām .
SFX 510 Y 1
SFX 510 0 kayā .
SFX 668 Y 1
SFX 668 0 antaḥ .
SFX 315 Y 1
SFX 315 0 vatīm .
SFX 553 Y 1
SFX 553 0 āneṣu .
SFX 757 Y 1
SFX 757 0 yamānānām .
SFX 139 Y 1
SFX 139 0 kasya .
SFX 509 Y 1
SFX 509 0 kāyai .
SFX 295 Y 1
SFX 295 0 tābhiḥ .
SFX 317 Y 1
SFX 317 0 vatībhyaḥ .
SFX 194 Y 1
SFX 194 0 van .
SFX 190 Y 1
SFX 190 0 vat .
SFX 644 Y 1
SFX 644 0 yābhiḥ .
SFX 436 Y 1
SFX 436 0 ntībhyām .
SFX 907 Y 1
SFX 907 0 māṇāya .
SFX 838 Y 1
SFX 838 0 māṇam .
SFX 837 Y 1
SFX 837 0 māṇau .
SFX 451 Y 1
SFX 451 0 vaḥ .
SFX 353 Y 1
SFX 353 0 yayoḥ .
SFX 314 Y 1
SFX 314 0 vatīṣu .
SFX 593 Y 1
SFX 593 0 adbhiḥ .
SFX 663 Y 1
SFX 663 0 aye .
SFX 33 Y 1
SFX 33 0 ṇa .
SFX 135 Y 1
SFX 135 0 ṇe .
SFX 96 Y 1
SFX 96 0 ṇi .
SFX 692 Y 1
SFX 692 0 vyā .
SFX 788 Y 1
SFX 788 0 nīyeṣu .
SFX 99 Y 1
SFX 99 0 tyoḥ .
SFX 665 Y 1
SFX 665 0 antam .
SFX 664 Y 1
SFX 664 0 antau .
SFX 913 Y 1
SFX 913 0 māṇaiḥ .
SFX 661 Y 1
SFX 661 0 nāḥ .
SFX 589 Y 1
SFX 589 0 itasya .
SFX 759 Y 1
SFX 759 0 yamānaiḥ .
SFX 920 Y 1
SFX 920 0 nīyām .
SFX 798 Y 1
SFX 798 0 nīyān .
SFX 763 Y 1
SFX 763 0 nīyāt .
SFX 735 Y 1
SFX 735 0 vyāsu .
SFX 915 Y 1
SFX 915 0 māṇābhyām .
SFX 611 Y 1
SFX 611 0 itān .
SFX 588 Y 1
SFX 588 0 itāt .
SFX 195 Y 1
SFX 195 0 vataḥ .
SFX 495 Y 1
SFX 495 0 tvasya .
SFX 579 Y 1
SFX 579 0 itābhyām .
SFX 288 Y 1
SFX 288 0 yataḥ .
SFX 210 Y 1
SFX 210 0 ābhyām .
SFX 6 Y 1
SFX 6 0 iḥ .
SFX 404 Y 1
SFX 404 0 nasya .
SFX 219 Y 1
SFX 219 n si n
SFX 467 Y 1
SFX 467 ḥ ṣīm ḥ
SFX 592 Y 1
SFX 592 ḥ yā ḥ
SFX 937 Y 1
SFX 937 ā akāya ā
SFX 723 Y 1
SFX 723 ā amānāyām ā
SFX 883 Y 1
SFX 883 e itavyāyāḥ e
SFX 320 Y 1
SFX 320 ā avate ā
SFX 561 Y 1
SFX 561 e iṣe e
SFX 709 Y 1
SFX 709 ā amānam ā
SFX 713 Y 1
SFX 713 ā amānau ā
SFX 419 Y 1
SFX 419 ā abhyaḥ ā
SFX 725 Y 1
SFX 725 ā amānāyāḥ ā
SFX 289 Y 1
SFX 289 ā avān ā
SFX 842 Y 1
SFX 842 e itavye e
SFX 980 Y 1
SFX 980 e iṣyantyoḥ e
SFX 620 Y 1
SFX 620 e uṣīṇām e
SFX 563 Y 1
SFX 563 e imahe e
SFX 818 Y 1
SFX 818 a ānāt a
SFX 626 Y 1
SFX 626 e uṣībhiḥ e
SFX 822 Y 1
SFX 822 a ānābhyām a
SFX 852 Y 1
SFX 852 e itavyam e
SFX 522 Y 1
SFX 522 e ire e
SFX 41 Y 1
SFX 41 a āṇām a
SFX 879 Y 1
SFX 879 e itāsvaḥ e
SFX 678 Y 1
SFX 678 ī ikānām ī
SFX 917 Y 1
SFX 917 e ikābhyām e
SFX 14 Y 1
SFX 14 a ābhyām a
SFX 816 Y 1
SFX 816 a ānayoḥ a
SFX 743 Y 1
SFX 743 ī ikābhyaḥ ī
SFX 398 Y 1
SFX 398 ā avantī ā
SFX 935 Y 1
SFX 935 a ānāḥ a
SFX 630 Y 1
SFX 630 e uṣaḥ e
SFX 863 Y 1
SFX 863 e īyam e
SFX 265 Y 1
SFX 265 ā avyām ā
SFX 453 Y 1
SFX 453 ḥ ṣi ḥ
SFX 687 Y 1
SFX 687 e vas e
SFX 832 Y 1
SFX 832 e yeṣu e
SFX 627 Y 1
SFX 627 ḥ ri ḥ
SFX 233 Y 1
SFX 233 ā avyayoḥ ā
SFX 110 Y 1
SFX 110 ḥ he ḥ
SFX 304 Y 1
SFX 304 ā avati ā
SFX 999 Y 1
SFX 999 e iṣyan e
SFX 974 Y 1
SFX 974 e iṣyatsu e
SFX 874 Y 1
SFX 874 e itāstha e
SFX 682 Y 1
SFX 682 e vadbhyām e
SFX 855 Y 1
SFX 855 e itavyaḥ e
SFX 248 Y 1
SFX 248 ā avyān ā
SFX 940 Y 1
SFX 940 ā akasya ā
SFX 476 Y 1
SFX 476 ḥ ṣoḥ ḥ
SFX 172 Y 1
SFX 172 ū um ū
SFX 819 Y 1
SFX 819 a ānasya a
SFX 933 Y 1
SFX 933 ā akaiḥ ā
SFX 249 Y 1
SFX 249 u yām u
SFX 73 Y 1
SFX 73 u yaḥ u
SFX 845 Y 1
SFX 845 e itavyāya e
SFX 55 Y 1
SFX 55 ī ibhyām ī
SFX 683 Y 1
SFX 683 e vadbhyaḥ e
SFX 710 Y 1
SFX 710 ā amānaiḥ ā
SFX 829 Y 1
SFX 829 e yaiḥ e
SFX 916 Y 1
SFX 916 e ikayoḥ e
SFX 238 Y 1
SFX 238 ā avyāt ā
SFX 689 Y 1
SFX 689 e vāṃsam e
SFX 183 Y 1
SFX 183 u yā u
SFX 675 Y 1
SFX 675 e van e
SFX 705 Y 1
SFX 705 ā amānena ā
SFX 457 Y 1
SFX 457 ḥ ṣyau ḥ
SFX 475 Y 1
SFX 475 ḥ ṣā ḥ
SFX 461 Y 1
SFX 461 ḥ ṣyām ḥ
SFX 993 Y 1
SFX 993 e iṣyantībhyām e
SFX 61 Y 1
SFX 61 ī yai ī
SFX 870 Y 1
SFX 870 e īyāya e
SFX 811 Y 1
SFX 811 e yāt e
SFX 729 Y 1
SFX 729 ā amānābhiḥ ā
SFX 996 Y 1
SFX 996 e iṣyantau e
SFX 325 Y 1
SFX 325 ā avatā ā
SFX 943 Y 1
SFX 943 e ikāḥ e
SFX 526 Y 1
SFX 526 e vā e
SFX 808 Y 1
SFX 808 a āna a
SFX 237 Y 1
SFX 237 ā avyāya ā
SFX 39 Y 1
SFX 39 a ām a
SFX 228 Y 1
SFX 228 u yau u
SFX 153 Y 1
SFX 153 ī inām ī
SFX 45 Y 1
SFX 45 ā aiḥ ā
SFX 485 Y 1
SFX 485 ā adhve ā
SFX 918 Y 1
SFX 918 e ha e
SFX 841 Y 1
SFX 841 e itavyena e
SFX 961 Y 1
SFX 961 e yethām e
SFX 250 Y 1
SFX 250 u yai u
SFX 300 Y 1
SFX 300 a uḥ a
SFX 59 Y 1
SFX 59 ī yāḥ ī
SFX 703 Y 1
SFX 703 ā amānānām ā
SFX 548 Y 1
SFX 548 e uḥ e
SFX 865 Y 1
SFX 865 a ānāni a
SFX 458 Y 1
SFX 458 ḥ ṣyāḥ ḥ
SFX 706 Y 1
SFX 706 ā amānebhyaḥ ā
SFX 931 Y 1
SFX 931 e īyāḥ e
SFX 939 Y 1
SFX 939 ā ane ā
SFX 707 Y 1
SFX 707 ā amānāya ā
SFX 897 Y 1
SFX 897 ī ye ī
SFX 605 Y 1
SFX 605 ā ani ā
SFX 329 Y 1
SFX 329 ā avantam ā
SFX 326 Y 1
SFX 326 ā avantau ā
SFX 268 Y 1
SFX 268 ā avyāyām ā
SFX 978 Y 1
SFX 978 e iṣyataḥ e
SFX 853 Y 1
SFX 853 e itavyaiḥ e
SFX 830 Y 1
SFX 830 e yāya e
SFX 223 Y 1
SFX 223 i thaḥ i
SFX 833 Y 1
SFX 833 e yebhyaḥ e
SFX 990 Y 1
SFX 990 e iṣyantīḥ e
SFX 143 Y 1
SFX 143 ī ini ī
SFX 145 Y 1
SFX 145 ī ine ī
SFX 724 Y 1
SFX 724 ā amānāyai ā
SFX 47 Y 1
SFX 47 ā ataḥ ā
SFX 728 Y 1
SFX 728 ā amānābhyaḥ ā
SFX 15 Y 1
SFX 15 a āt a
SFX 618 Y 1
SFX 618 e uṣyā e
SFX 977 Y 1
SFX 977 e iṣyatam e
SFX 16 Y 1
SFX 16 a āya a
SFX 848 Y 1
SFX 848 e itavyataḥ e
SFX 704 Y 1
SFX 704 ā amānābhyām ā
SFX 146 Y 1
SFX 146 ī inaḥ ī
SFX 995 Y 1
SFX 995 e iṣyantībhiḥ e
SFX 151 Y 1
SFX 151 ī inam ī
SFX 152 Y 1
SFX 152 ī inau ī
SFX 803 Y 1
SFX 803 ḥ ma ḥ
SFX 560 Y 1
SFX 560 ṛ uḥ ṛ
SFX 714 Y 1
SFX 714 ā amānataḥ ā
SFX 67 Y 1
SFX 67 ī yau ī
SFX 473 Y 1
SFX 473 ā ase ā
SFX 633 Y 1
SFX 633 e uṣā e
SFX 240 Y 1
SFX 240 ā avyam ā
SFX 243 Y 1
SFX 243 ā avyau ā
SFX 840 Y 1
SFX 840 e itavyeṣu e
SFX 524 Y 1
SFX 524 ṛ ṝṇām ṛ
SFX 800 Y 1
SFX 800 ā aka ā
SFX 862 Y 1
SFX 862 ā ake ā
SFX 331 Y 1
SFX 331 e hām e
SFX 684 Y 1
SFX 684 e vadbhiḥ e
SFX 57 Y 1
SFX 57 ī iṣu ī
SFX 381 Y 1
SFX 381 ā avatyām ā
SFX 454 Y 1
SFX 454 ā adhvam ā
SFX 945 Y 1
SFX 945 ā akāt ā
SFX 613 Y 1
SFX 613 e uṣyau e
SFX 456 Y 1
SFX 456 ḥ ṣī ḥ
SFX 887 Y 1
SFX 887 e itavyām e
SFX 612 Y 1
SFX 612 e uṣyoḥ e
SFX 976 Y 1
SFX 976 e iṣyatī e
SFX 615 Y 1
SFX 615 e uṣyai e
SFX 824 Y 1
SFX 824 a ānebhyaḥ a
SFX 825 Y 1
SFX 825 e itha e
SFX 827 Y 1
SFX 827 e itāraḥ e
SFX 36 Y 1
SFX 36 ā am ā
SFX 27 Y 1
SFX 27 ā au ā
SFX 40 Y 1
SFX 40 ā ai ā
SFX 330 Y 1
SFX 330 ā avantaḥ ā
SFX 864 Y 1
SFX 864 e itum e
SFX 882 Y 1
SFX 882 e itavyāyai e
SFX 385 Y 1
SFX 385 ā avatyā ā
SFX 290 Y 1
SFX 290 e ya e
SFX 147 Y 1
SFX 147 ī inoḥ ī
SFX 690 Y 1
SFX 690 e vāṃsaḥ e
SFX 389 Y 1
SFX 389 ā avatīḥ ā
SFX 245 Y 1
SFX 245 ā avyaḥ ā
SFX 464 Y 1
SFX 464 ḥ ṣyoḥ ḥ
SFX 469 Y 1
SFX 469 ḥ ṣībhyaḥ ḥ
SFX 323 Y 1
SFX 323 ā avadbhyaḥ ā
SFX 10 Y 1
SFX 10 t ya t
SFX 254 Y 1
SFX 254 ā an ā
SFX 160 Y 1
SFX 160 ū ubhyaḥ ū
SFX 988 Y 1
SFX 988 e iṣyantīnām e
SFX 836 Y 1
SFX 836 e īyābhyām e
SFX 74 Y 1
SFX 74 ī im ī
SFX 954 Y 1
SFX 954 ā akeṣu ā
SFX 70 Y 1
SFX 70 ī itaḥ ī
SFX 225 Y 1
SFX 225 e va e
SFX 749 Y 1
SFX 749 ī ikāyai ī
SFX 418 Y 1
SFX 418 i va i
SFX 921 Y 1
SFX 921 a ānau a
SFX 1000 Y 1
SFX 1000 e iṣyadbhyām e
SFX 414 Y 1
SFX 414 ī iṇam ī
SFX 415 Y 1
SFX 415 ī iṇau ī
SFX 699 Y 1
SFX 699 t va t
SFX 328 Y 1
SFX 328 ā avatām ā
SFX 424 Y 1
SFX 424 ā asu ā
SFX 847 Y 1
SFX 847 e itavyāt e
SFX 93 Y 1
SFX 93 ī in ī
SFX 986 Y 1
SFX 986 e iṣyantyā e
SFX 410 Y 1
SFX 410 ī iṇaḥ ī
SFX 13 Y 1
SFX 13 a āḥ a
SFX 25 Y 1
SFX 25 ā aḥ ā
SFX 716 Y 1
SFX 716 ā amānaḥ ā
SFX 460 Y 1
SFX 460 ḥ ṣyā ḥ
SFX 226 Y 1
SFX 226 u yāḥ u
SFX 677 Y 1
SFX 677 e vān e
SFX 877 Y 1
SFX 877 e itāsthaḥ e
SFX 392 Y 1
SFX 392 ā avatībhiḥ ā
SFX 512 Y 1
SFX 512 ī ike ī
SFX 391 Y 1
SFX 391 ā avatībhyaḥ ā
SFX 387 Y 1
SFX 387 ā avatīnām ā
SFX 416 Y 1
SFX 416 ī iṇām ī
SFX 616 Y 1
SFX 616 e uṣyāḥ e
SFX 856 Y 1
SFX 856 e itavyābhyām e
SFX 698 Y 1
SFX 698 ā amāna ā
SFX 246 Y 1
SFX 246 ā avyena ā
SFX 161 Y 1
SFX 161 ū ubhiḥ ū
SFX 348 Y 1
SFX 348 ā atām ā
SFX 625 Y 1
SFX 625 e uṣībhyaḥ e
SFX 270 Y 1
SFX 270 ā avyāyāḥ ā
SFX 672 Y 1
SFX 672 e īya e
SFX 66 Y 1
SFX 66 ī yaḥ ī
SFX 132 Y 1
SFX 132 a āthām a
SFX 981 Y 1
SFX 981 e iṣyantyau e
SFX 835 Y 1
SFX 835 e īyayoḥ e
SFX 634 Y 1
SFX 634 e uṣām e
SFX 660 Y 1
SFX 660 ū uṇā ū
SFX 273 Y 1
SFX 273 ā avyābhyaḥ ā
